Washington statutes.
RCW 11.12.170

Devise of land, what passes.

Every devise of land in any will shall be construed to convey all the estate of the devisor therein which he or she could lawfully devise, unless it shall clearly appear by the will that he or she intended to convey a less estate.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2013; 1965 c 145 s 11.12.170. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 39; RRS s 1409; prior: Code 1881 s 1332; 1863 p 209 s 69; 1860 p 172 s 36.]